District of Columbia statutes.
25-832

Prompt notice of investigative reports.

(a)

ABRA shall provide a licensee with either an investigative report or a public police incident report that may result in a show cause hearing as set forth in § 25-447 within 90 days of the date upon which the incident occurred.

(b)

The requirement in subsection (a) of this section shall not apply where:

(1)

Criminal action is being considered against the licensee or its employees; or

(2)

Enforcement action is requested by the Chief of Police under § 25-827.

History

Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-361, § 2(d)(4), 56 DCR 1204
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 81(c), 59 DCR 6190

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-725.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 added a colon at the end of the introductory language of (b).